District of Columbia statutes.
50-1541.12

Effect of certificate of title.

A certificate of title is prima facie evidence of the accuracy of the information in the record that constitutes the certificate of title.

Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-215, § 13, 61 DCR 13083
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-215: Section 32 of D.C. Law 20-215 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2016.